Utah statutes.
17-8-7.   Declaration of drought emergency -- Appropriation -- Tax levy.
The county legislative body of each county may at any regular meeting or at a
special meeting called for such purpose, declare that an emergency drought
exists in said county; and thereupon may appropriate from the moneys not
otherwise appropriated in the county general fund such funds as shall be
necessary for the gathering of information upon, and aiding in any program for
increased precipitation within said county or in conjunction with any other
county or counties, or that if there are not sufficient funds available in the
county general fund for such purpose,  the county legislative body may, during
any such emergency so declared by them, assess, levy, and direct the county to
collect annually to aid in any program of increased precipitation. The
provisions of Sections 17-19-1 to 17-19-28 relating to budgeting shall not
apply to appropriations necessitated by such an emergency.
